test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-F-С_С-сердце_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - сердце M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: се́рдце
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: се́рдце
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: се́рдца
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: се́рдце
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: се́рдцу
      сердце+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: се́рдцем
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: сердца́
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: сердца́
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: серде́ц
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: сердца́х
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: сердца́м
      сердце+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: сердца́ми
